Spell/share/myspell/dicts/el_GR.aff
SFX g Y 4
SFX g ώ          άται        .         # λυπώ > λυπάται
SFX g ός         ότων        .         # γεγονός γεγονότων
SFX g ης         ηδων        .         # νοικοκύρης > νοικοκύρηδων
SFX g α          αν          .         # αγαπούσα > αγαπούσαν

SFX h Y 4
SFX h ώ          ούμαστε     .         # λυπώ > λυπούμαστε
SFX h ώς         ώτος        .         # καθεστώς > καθεστώτος
SFX h όμουν      όμαστε      .         # δενόμουν > δενόμαστε
SFX h α          ας          .         # ώρα > ώρας

SFX i Y 4
SFX i ώ          ώντας       .         # αγαπώ > αγαπώντας
SFX i ής         ές          .         # νικητής > νικητές
SFX i ά          ές          .         # καρδιά > καρδιές
SFX i ή          ές          .         # ψυχή > ψυχές

SFX j Y 3
SFX j ης         ικο         .         # ζηλιάρης > ζηλιάρικο
SFX j ω          τε          .         # δέσω > δέστε
SFX j ος         ους         .         # δρόμος > δρόμους

SFX k Y 3
SFX k ω          εται        .         # δένω > δένεται
SFX k ος         οι          .         # δρόμος > δρόμοι
SFX k ας         ατος        .         # κρέας > κρέατος

SFX l Y 4
SFX l υ          ια          .         # βράδυ > βράδια
SFX l ι          ια          .         # καλοκαίρι > καλοκαίρια
SFX l ώ          ούμαι       .         # λυπώ > λυπούμαι
SFX l ής         ήδων        .         # μπαλωματής > μπαλωματήδων

SFX m Y 3
SFX m ώ          άει         .         # αγαπώ > αγαπάει
SFX m όμουν      όσαστε      .         # δενόμουν > δενόσαστε
SFX m ω          ει          .         # δένω > δένει  

SFX n Y 3
SFX n ύς         ιοί         .        # βαθύς > βαθιοί 
SFX n ώ          είτε        .        # αγαπηθώ > αγαπηθείτε
SFX n ος         ο           .        # δρόμος > δρόμο
