Spell/share/myspell/dicts/el_GR.dic
Βραΐλα/h
Γιάννος/IXdn
Καββαδία/h
Κορνήλιος/n
Νεύτωνα/h
Προκόπιος/den
Σπυριδούλα/h
άγδαρτος/IQXdejkn
άζωστος/IQXdejkn
άκαπνος/IQXdejkn
άνευρος/IQXdejkn
άπλερος/IQXdejkn
άρτος/Qdejkn
άτεγκτος/IQXdejkn
άφταστος/IQXdejkn
έβαινα/eg
έβενος/Qdejkn
έληξα/eg
ένδοξος/IQXdejkn
έστεφα/eg
έφορος/Qdejkn
έχουσα/Nh
ίσιωσα/Neg
αβάσταγος/IQXdejkn
αβύθιστος/IQXdejkn
αγγόνι/l
αγκιστρώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
αγροτοσυνδικαλιστής/Li
αδέσμευτος/IQXdejkn
αδιάθετος/IQXdejkn
αδιασαφήνιστος/IQXdjkn
αδυσώπητος/IQXdejkn
αεριτζής/UXl
αερογέφυρα/Nh
αζάρωτος/IQXdejkn
αιλουροειδή/LWi
αιματοκυλίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
αιματώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
ακίνδυνος/IQXdejkn
ακαμπούριαστος/IQXdejkn
ακατόρθωτος/IQXdejkn
ακολουθούσα/aeg
ακουμπώ/FGMOPim
ακούνητος/IQXdejkn
ακριβούτσικος/IQXdejkn
αλήθεια/Ngh
αλαβάστρινος/IQXdejkn
αλληλοδιδακτική/LWi
αλληλοσφαζόμουν/YZhm
αλλοπαρμένος/IQXdejkn
αλόγιστος/IQXdejkn
αμαχαίρωτος/IQXdejkn
αμερικανάκι/l
αμούσκευτος/IQXdejkn
αμπαλαρόμουν/YZhm
αμφιλεγόμενος/IQXdejkn
αμφισβητώ/JKMeiln
ανάρκωτος/IQXdejkn
ανέβηκα/eg
αναγκαίος/HIQdejkn
αναδιατυπώσω/GPTYabjm
αναισθησιολόγος/Qdkn
ανακάλυψα/eg
ανακρούω/RSTVWckm
αναλιγωνόμουν/YZhm
αναλογιστικής/HLXi
αναμορφώσω/GPTYabjm
αναστύλωνα/Neg
ανατρέψω/TYabjm
αναχώσω/GPTYabjm
ανδραποδίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
ανεμοδερνόμουν/YZhm
ανεξάλειπτος/IQXdejkn
ανημέρωτος/IQXdejkn
ανθοστρώσω/GPTYabjm
ανισοταχής/Li
ανομολόγητος/IQXdejkn
αντεπεξερχόμουν/YZhm
αντιδανέιζα/Neg
αντικοβόμουν/YZhm
αντιπλημμυρική/LWi
αντισταθμίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
ανόθευτος/IQXdejkn
αξεπούλητος/IQXdejkn
αξιότιμος/IQXdejkn
απέτρεπα/eg
απίδι/l
απίκραντος/IQXdejkn
απαγκιστρώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
απαράλλαχτος/IXden
απεικονιζόμουν/YZhm
απειρόκαλος/IQXdejkn
απλοποιήσω/GTYajm
αποβλακωτική/LWi
αποδελτίωνα/Neg
αποθέτω/RSTVWYckm
αποκριάτικος/IQXdejkn
απολιόρκητος/IQXdejkn
αποσταίνω/m
αποτελούσα/Negh
αποτροπιαζόμουν/YZhm
απροσάρμοστος/IQXdejkn
απροσκύνητος/IQXdejkn
απρόσωπος/IQXdejkn
αρθρωμένος/IQXdejkn
αρμίδι/l
αρματωσιά/i
αρματώσω/GPTYabjm
αρπαχνόμουν/YZhm
αρχαιολόγος/Qdjkn
ασάφεια/Nh
ασπόριαστος/IQXdejkn
αστάρωνα/Neg
αστηλίτευτος/IQXdejkn
ασυγχώνευτος/IQXdejkn
ασύνορος/IQXdejkn
αταλαιπώρητος/IQXdejkn
ατοίμαστος/IQXdejkn
αυτοθαυμαζόμουν/YZhm
αυτοκτονήσω/TYm
αυτονομιστή/LWi
αφαιμάσσω/RSTVWck
αφορίσω/GPTYabjm
αχάιδευτος/IQXdejkn
αχούρι/l
βάλτωσα/Neg
βίαιος/IQXdejkn
βαθμολογία/Nh
βαλσαμώσω/GPTYabjm
βαριοκαρδίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
βασικότερος/IQXdejkn
βελανίδι/l
βλαβερής/HLXi
βλεφάριζα/Neg
βουλευόμουν/YZhm
βρέχω/JRSTVWYckm
βραβευμένος/IQXdekn
βραχιόλι/l
βόειος/IQdejkn
γαλανόλευκος/IQXdejkn
γαϊτάνι/l
γειτονιά/GLi
γελάστηκα/Neg
γερουσία/h
γεύω/RSVWck
γκάζι/l
γκαβώνω/GPTYabm
γλυκούτσικος/IQXdejkn
γουλιά/Li
γρίπος/Xdjn
γρανάζι/l
γρατσουνιζόμουν/YZhm
γρύλισα/Neg
γωνιαζόμουν/CYZhm
γόνος/Qdjkn
δίτροχος/IQXdejkn
δασκαλίστικος/IQXdejkn
δεκαπενταπλάσιος/IQdejkn
δετική/LWi
δεφτέρι/l
δηλωθείσα/Nh
διάνοια/Ngh
διαβιώσω/GPTYabjm
διαδίδω/JRSTVWckm
διαθέσιμος/IQXdejkn
διακοίνωσα/Neg
διακομίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
διαπλαθόμουν/YZhm
διαπνέω/RSVWckm
διασκευή/LWi
διατύπωσα/Neg
διαχαρασσόμουν/YZhm
διερχόμενος/IQXdjkn
δικαιολογία/Nh
διοικούμενος/QXdjkn
διπλάσιος/IQdejkn
διφυή/LWi
δοκίμασα/Neg
δονώ/IJMel
δουλωνόμουν/YZhm
δυσδιάκριτος/IQXdejkn
δυσοσμία/Nh
δυσπρόφερτος/IQXdejkn
δυόσμος/n
εδραιώνω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
εθνογραφική/LWi
εκατονταετηρίδα/h
εκβιομηχάνιζα/Neg
εκβουλγαριζόμουν/YZhm
εκκινήσω/GPTYjm
εκλέξιμος/IQXdejkn
εκρέω/m
εκτελούσα/egh
εκτιμώμενος/IQXdejkn
εκτοπιζόμουν/YZhm
εκτυφλωτική/LWi
ελάτι/l
ελευθερώσω/GPTYabjm
εμπορεύτηκα/eg
ενέργεια/Nh
εναγόμενος/IQXdejkn
ενδιαφερόμενος/IQXdejkn
ενδοθωρακική/LWi
ενδομήτριος/IQdejkn
ενθυλακώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
εντυπωσίασα/eg
εξακριβωνόμουν/YZhm
εξανέμιζα/Neg
εξαπολυόμουν/YZhm
εξαργυρώσιμος/IQXdejkn
εξαχρειώσω/GPTYabjm
εξιδρωματική/LWi
εξομοιούμενος/IQXdjkn
εξορκιζόμουν/YZhm
εξουθένωσα/Neg
εξυπηρετώ/JKMeiln
επίχρυσος/IQXdejkn
επαλήθευσα/eg
επανακαθόμουν/YZhm
επειγόμουν/YZhm
επιδημιολόγος/Qdjk
επιεικής/HLXi
επικουρία/Nh
επιλέχτηκα/eg
επιλήνιος/IQdejkn
επιπλώσω/GPTYabjm
επουράνια/Neh
ερμηνευτή/LWi
ερωτήσω/Gm
εστίασα/eg
ετεροφυλόφιλος/IQXdejkn
ετερόρρυθμος/IQXdejkn
ετοιμόρροπος/IQXdejkn
ευσπλαγχνιζόμουν/YZhm
εφήμερος/IQXdejkn
εφετζίδικος/IQXdejkn
εωθινή/LWi
ζάρι/l
ζορίσω/GPTYabjm
ζυγοστάθμισα/Neg
ζόρι/l
ηλεκτρισμένος/Xjn
ηλικιωνόμουν/YZhm
ηλιοκαμένος/IQXdejkn
ηλιόλουστος/IQXdejkn
θαμβής/HLXi
θεόμουρλος/IQXdejkn
θεόπνευστος/IQXdejkn
θημωνιαζόμουν/YZhm
θρησκευτικότητα/h
θυμήθηκα/Neg
θωρακωτή/LWi
ισοτελή/LWi
ισόθερμος/IQXdejkn
ιταλιάνικος/IQXdejkn
ιόνιος/IQdejkn
κάπελα/h
κέντρισα/Neg
καζανάκι/l
καθίζω/DGPTYabm
κακοσυστηνόμουν/YZhm
κακότροπος/IQXdejkn
κακώνυμος/IQXdejkn
καλακουγόμουν/YZhm
καλαφάτιζα/Neg
καλντερίμι/l
καλοσκεπαζόμουν/YZhm
καλοστρώσω/GPTYabjm
καλόμοιρος/IQXdejkn
κανίσκι/l
καντιανή/LWi
καραούλι/l
καρδαμώσω/GPTYabjm
καρτερευόμουν/YZhm
καρυδάτος/IQXdejkn
καρφίτσωσα/Neg
καταβαραθρώσω/GPTYabjm
καταζητώ/JKMeil
καταξίωσα/Neg
καταφέρνω/JPTYabm
καταχώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
κατηγορούμενος/IXdejkn
καυχησιάρικος/IQXdejkn
καφενεδάκι/l
καφετέρια/Nh
κελτική/LWi
κερδοσκόπησα/eg
κηρύσσω/JRSTVWckm
κινητοποιώ/JKMeil
κοκότα/h
κολάσιμος/IQXdejkn
κολυμπητά/Li
κομιτατζής/Ul
κοντοζυγώσω/GPTYabjm
κοντοζύγωνα/Neg
κορίτσι/l
κουκούτσι/l
κουταβάκι/l
κουτσοδουλευόμουν/YZhm
κουτσουλίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
κρασοποτιζόμουν/YZhm
κρομμύδι/l
κρυσταλλώσω/CGPTYabjm
κτυπούσα/eg
κυανωπή/LWi
κυριαρχία/Nh
κόκκος/Qdjkn
λάμπω/GTem
λίκνισα/Neg
λαγούμι/l
λεπτεπίλεπτος/IQXdejkn
λερναία/Neh
λευκαυγή/LWi
λιπαίνω/RSTVWck
λιώσω/GPTYabejm
λουλουδάκι/l
μάχαιρα/Ngh
μέρα/Ngh
μακαρίτης/Xj
μακαρόνι/l
μακροκατάληκτος/IQXdejkn
μαοϊκή/LWi
μαργαριτάρι/l
ματανοιγόμουν/YZhm
μειοψηφούσα/eg
μελίσσι/l
μελώσω/GPTYabjm
μεσάτος/IQXdejkn
μετάγω/RSTVWckm
μεταρρυθμιστή/LWi
μετοίκισα/Neg
μηχανάκι/l
μισθοφόρος/Qjkn
μισοκαιγόμουν/YZhm
μοιρασμένος/IQXdejkn
μολυσματική/LWi
μουντζαλώσω/GPTYabjm
μουτζουρώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
μουφτής/UXl
μπαϊλντίσω/GPTYabjm
μπιρμπίλι/l
μπλάβισα/Neg
μπούτι/l
ναυκληρική/LWi
νευρολογία/h
νηστίσιμος/IQXdejkn
νι/l
νοσηλευτική/LWi
ντα/eg
νυχτιάτικος/IQXdejkn
νύχι/l
ξακουσμένος/IQXdejkn
ξακριζόμουν/YZhm
ξανάνιωνα/Neg
ξεκληριζόμουν/YZhm
ξεμπλεκόμουν/YZhm
ξεπάτωνα/Neg
ξεσκονίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
ξημερώσω/GPTYabjm
ξυπόλυτος/IXdkn
οδηγώ/GIJKMehilmn
οινική/LWi
ολιγώρησα/eg
ολογραφία/h
ολόξενος/IQXdejkn
οξυγονώνω/GPRSTVWYabckm
οργανολογική/LWi
ορθάνοιχτος/IQXdejkn
ορισμένος/HIQXdejkn
παιδοκομική/LWi
παλάτι/l
παμπόνηρος/IQXdejkn
παντοδυναμία/h
παπαδάκι/l
παράχωνα/Neg
παρακούω/JRSVWckm
παρεμποδίζω/GJPRSTVWYabckm
παρεμποδίσω/GPTYabjm
παρεντερική/LWi
παστέλι/l
περίλυπος/IQXdejkn
περβόλι/l
περικλείω/JPRSTVWckm
περικοπτόμουν/YZhm
περιρρέοντα/g
περιστροφική/LWi
περιχωματιζόμουν/YZhm
πιατάκι/l
πλακόστρωτος/IQXdejkn
πλουτολογική/LWi
πνευμόνι/l
πολυδουλευόμουν/YZhm
πολυκύτταρος/IQXdejkn
πολυπρόσωπος/IQXdejkn
πολυστοιβαζόμουν/YZhm
πουλάκι/l
πραξικοπηματική/LWi
προήλασα/g
προασφαλίσω/GPTYabjm
προλιμένα/h
προπηλακίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
προσαυξάνω/JRSTVWckm
προσομοιωτή/LWi
προσωπάκι/l
πρυτάνευσα/eg
πρωθύστερος/IQXdejkn
πρωτοφαινόμουν/YZhm
πυξίδα/Nh
πυροβολώ/JKMimn
ρεμάλι/l
ριγανάτος/IQXdejkn
ρινόφωνος/IQXdejkn
σάλι/l
σαββατιανή/LWi
σαμάρωνα/Neg
σαρίκι/l
σημαιοστολίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
σιγουρευόμουν/YZhm
σιδερόφραχτος/IQXdejkn
σκακιστική/LWi
σκουπίδι/l
σμπαραλιάζω/RSVWck
σπίθισα/Neg
σπαραξικάρδιος/IQdejkn
σπληνική/LWi
σπογγίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
στοίβα/Nh
στολίδι/l
στρωτή/LWi
συγκλήθηκα/eg
συγχέω/JPRSTVWYckm
συμπαρασταθώ/JKMn
συμπρόεδρος/kn
συναναστροφή/LWi
συνετιζόμουν/YZhm
συνοδεύτηκα/eg
συνταραζόμουν/YZhm
συρρικνώσω/GPTYabjm
σχισμής/LRXi
τάσι/l
ταράσσω/RSTVWck
τελώνιζα/Neg
τεμαχιζόμουν/CDYZhm
τερπόμουν/YZhm
τετράφωνος/IQXdejkn
τιμή/LWi
τουλούμι/l
τρίχρονος/IQXdejkn
τροφοδοτώ/JKMeil
τροχιόδρομος/dkn
τσιμπιδάκι/l
τσουρούφλισα/Neg
τυφλωνόμουν/CYZhm
υβρίσω/GPTYabjm
υδροθειούχος/IQdejkn
υπεκφυγή/LWi
υπερχρονίσω/GPTYabjm
υποσυνείδητος/IQXdejkn
υποφέροντα/gh
φαγωνόμουν/YZhm
φαιδρής/HLXi
φαλιρίσω/GPTYabjm
φθηνότερος/IQXdekn
φιλοτιμώ/Jl
φοινικική/LWi
φορτίσω/CGPTYabjm
φρύνος/k
φωτοτυπική/LWi
χίπης/Xfgj
χαλίκι/l
χαλικοστρώσω/GPTYabjm
χαμοσερνόμουν/YZhm
χοίρινος/IQXdejkn
χράμι/l
χρηματοοικονομική/LWi
χρυσώσω/GPTYabjm
χωματίζω/GPRSTVWYabckm
ψευτοφτιαχνόμουν/YZhm
ψηλάφισα/Neg
ψυχομαραινόμουν/YZhm
ψυχοτεχνική/LWi
